




Torrence  Wilson's Phone & Address | PeopleByName















 
Contact
Login










 Home
People Alphabetically
W
Wilson

Torrence  Wilson




People directory with over 600,000,000 names!

Record ID: 107299768Torrence  Wilson5 Clobertin CtBloomington, IL 61701(309) 661-8448Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299769Torrence  Wilson5131 Redstone DrJacksonville, FL 32210(904) 771-0722Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299770Torrence  Wilson74 Concord StNashua, NH 03064(603) 598-5203Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299771Torrence  Wilson73 William StGreenwich, CT 06830(203) 552-9471Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299772Torrence  Wilson1650 Corning AveMemphis, TN 38127(901) 357-1023Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299773Torrence  Wilson6500 Venoy RdGarden City, MI 48135(734) 266-0479Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299774Torrence D Wilson44 Strawberry Hill AveStamford, CT 06902Age 49 (Born 1968)Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299775Torrence D Wilson658 Newfield AveStamford, CT 06905Age 49 (Born 1968)(203) 323-5456Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299776Torrence D Wilson7925 Kirkridge StBelleville, MI 48111Age 42 (Born Oct 1975)(734) 697-0187Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299777Torrence D Wilson74 Concord StNashua, NH 03064Age 49 (Born 1968)Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299778Torrence D Wilson1315 13th AvePortland, OR 97214Age 49 (Born Oct 1968)(503) 236-7198Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299779Torrence J Wilson5630 Ridgeway DrHouston, TX 77033Age 46 (Born Jun 1971)(713) 738-0365Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299780Torrence J Wilson5218 Banting WayDallas, TX 75227Age 53 (Born 1964)(214) 275-5417Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299781Torrence M Wilson2300 Hardwood Ct SwRochester, MN 55902Age 74 (Born 1943)(507) 288-3368Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299782Torrence M Wilson5218 Banting WayDallas, TX 75227Age 53 (Born May 1964)Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299783Torrence M Wilson1315 13th AvePortland, OR 97214Age 74 (Born 1943)(503) 236-7198Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299784Torrence L Wilson102 Maple HtsNew Lexington, OH 43764Age 98 (Born Nov 1919)(740) 342-3432Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299785Torrence B Wilson6520 El PresideoPensacola, FL 32504Age 44 (Born 1973)Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299786Torrence B Wilson4121 Bienville BlvdOcean Springs, MS 39564Age 44 (Born 1973)Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299787Torrence B Wilson247 Broad StSavannah, GA 31401Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299788Torrence B Wilson17036 78th AveAlachua, FL 32615Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299789Torrence B Wilson970 Saint Francis BlvdDaly City, CA 94015Age 44 (Born Oct 1973)Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299790Torrence B Wilson103 Sandy LnNorwich, CT 06360(860) 885-0782Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299791Torrence B Wilson200 Lakeview AvePacifica, CA 94044Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299792Torrence B Wilson740a Renfrew RdEl Sobrante, CA 94803Age 44 (Born 1973)Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299793Torrence B Wilson700 College BlvdPensacola, FL 32504Age 44 (Born 1973)Background Check - Available
Record ID: 107299794Torrence C Wilson3411 Edinburgh AveRiverside, CA 92507Background Check - Available








 


 




1,379,043,021 total records available




Tweet





  Testimonials Read testimonials from real customers who already used our services. Read More

  Webmasters Earn 75% commission on every sale you drive to our website. Weekly payouts! Read More

   Mobile Version Visit us from your smart phone anywhere you are. Read More

   Recent Lookups Check out the most recent reverse phone lookups on PeopleByName.com Read More

 



 Home Mobile Version Phone Directory People Directory Remove information
 Terms of Service Privacy Policy Affiliate Program About Us 
 Member Login Frequently Asked Questions Contact Us Testimonials 
 Careers Product & Services Volume Discounts Site Map 




© PeopleByName All Rights Reserved. 2010-2017







ARLP Wilson M. Torrence Insider Trades for Alliance Resource Partners L.P.


































Bulletin






Investor Alert





















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































Alliance Resource Partners L.P.

                  NASDAQ: ARLP
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

Alliance Resource Partners L.P.



After Hours
 --Quotes are delayed by 20 min
Jul 28, 2017, 7:40 p.m.


ARLP

/quotes/zigman/67256/composite


$
21.75




Change

+1.70
+8.48%

Volume
Volume 3,973
Quotes are delayed by 20 min








/quotes/zigman/67256/composite
Today's close

$
			19.90
		


$
				20.05
			
Change

+0.15
+0.75%





Day low
Day high
$19.60
$20.10










52 week low
52 week high

            $18.15
        

            $26.65
        


















Insider Activity


Individual




Wilson M. Torrence



Mr. Wilson M. Torrence is on the Board of Directors at Alliance GP LLC, Alliance Holdings GP LP, Alliance Resource Partners LP and Alliance Resource Management Group LLC. Mr. Torrence was previously employed as Chief Financial Officer & Director by Cleantech America, Inc., SVP-Project Development & Investments by Fluor Corp., President & CEO-Waste to Energy Division by Combustion Engineering, Inc., Assistant Treasurer by ExxonMobil Oil Corp., Chairman by Institute of Resource Recovery, and Chief Financial Officer by Mobil Land Development Corp. He received his undergraduate degree from Virginia Polytechnic Institute & State University and an MBA from Virginia Polytechnic Institute & State University.



Transactions


Date
Shares
Transaction
Value





11/15/2012
1,000


 
Acquisition at $52.87 per share.


52,870





        Copyright 2017 FactSet Research Systems Inc. All rights reserved. Source FactSet Fundamentals.
    











            Officers and Executives
        





Mr. Joseph W. Craft 
President, Chief Executive Officer & Director




Mr. Thomas M. Wynne 
Chief Operating Officer & Senior Vice President




Mr. Brian L. Cantrell 
Chief Financial Officer & Senior Vice President




Mr. Charles R. Wesley 
Director & Executive Vice President




Mr. Heath A. Lovell 
Vice President-Public Affairs




Mr. R. Eberley Davis 
Secretary, Senior Vice President & General Counsel




Mr. John P. Neafsey 
Chairman




Mr. Nick  Carter 
Independent Director




Mr. Wilson M. Torrence 
Independent Director




Mr. John Harris Robinson 
Independent Director
















Log In




9:39 PM EDT
July 28, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
9:16pWall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials
7:39pBarron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News
7:29pA Wild Week in Washington 
6:32pThe dark side of cruises
6:32pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
6:31pO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
6:31p Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'
6:31pHere are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings
6:29pTop 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 
6:29pThis is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...
6:29p3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
6:27pPaint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400
6:27pAmericans’ new badge of honor: ‘I was blocked by a celebrity!’
6:27p5 weird things I found out about America in my first 24 hours 
6:14pBeyond Tesla: 7 stocks driving the autonomous car revolution
6:14pThese 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
6:11pWatch out: ‘Kids’ are making the most money in this stock market 
6:10p7 real ways for millennials to save money (not by brownbagging and skipping Starbucks)
6:09p‘Game of Thrones’: This computer model predicts who will be killed off — or survive
6:09pThis basic balanced index fund is beating the hedge fund averages
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,830.31

+33.76
+0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,374.68

-7.51
-0.12%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.10

-3.32
-0.13%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15
























































St Johnsbury Vermont Doctors and Providers





























Search






St Johnsbury Doctors and Health Care Providers





Home



 > 


Vermont



 > 
 St Johnsbury



Please select the type of doctor or health care provider you are looking for in St Johnsbury, Vermont.Currently there are 88 health care professions and a total of 226 doctors and professionals providing care to residents in St Johnsbury.

Due to the large number of providers in many cities, it might be easier to use our search engine by clicking the link in the navigational bar at the top of the page or here: Search.
After selecting a listing you will be able to view contact information, ratings, medicare participation, and the cost of specific services and procedures.





Please Click on a Medical Specialty to view Professions and Specializations

Mental Health Providers, Social Workers, Therapists

Counselor

Specialization(s):
Addiction (Substance Use Disorder)


Mental Health


Professional


Psychologist

Specialization(s):
Clinical


Counseling


Social Worker

Specialization(s):
Clinical


Marriage & Family Therapist


Doctors, Physicians, and Surgeons

Anesthesiology


Emergency Medicine


Family Medicine


Internal Medicine

Specialization(s):
Sleep Medicine


Obstetrics & Gynecology

Specialization(s):
Gynecology


Ophthalmology


Orthopaedic Surgery


Otolaryngology


Pediatrics


Psychiatry & Neurology

Specialization(s):
Neurology


Psychiatry


Addiction Psychiatry


Radiology

Specialization(s):
Diagnostic Radiology


Diagnostic Ultrasound


Surgery


Urology


General Practice


Dentists, Denturists, and Dental Hygienists

Dentist

Specialization(s):
General Practice


Orthodontics and Dentofacial Orthopedics


Optometrists, Eye and Vision Technicians

Optometrist

Specialization(s):
Low Vision Rehabilitation


Chiropractors

Chiropractor

Specialization(s):
Orthopedic


Dietitians and Nutritionists

Dietitian, Registered


Hospitals

General Acute Care Hospital

Specialization(s):
Critical Access


Podiatrists and Podiatric Surgeons

Podiatrist

Specialization(s):
Foot & Ankle Surgery


RNs, LPNs, and additional Nursing Service Providers

Registered Nurse


Respiratory, Developmental, Rehabilitative

 and Restorative Service Providers

Physical Therapist

Specialization(s):
Sports


Physical Therapy Assistant


Specialist / Technologist

Specialization(s):
Athletic Trainer


Massage Therapist


Occupational Therapist


Audiologists, Speech-Language Pathologists, Specialists / Technologists and Hearing Instrument Specialists

Speech-Language Pathologist


Audiologist-Hearing Aid Fitter


Hearing Instrument Specialist


Clinics, Centers, and Ambulatory Health Care Facilities

Clinic / Center

Specialization(s):
Ambulatory Surgical


Dental


End-Stage Renal Disease (ESRD) Treatment


Federally Qualified Health Center (FQHC)


Health Service


Adult Mental Health


Methadone Clinic


Primary Care


Rural Health


Physician Assistants & Advanced Practice Nursing Providers

Physician Assistant

Specialization(s):
Surgical


Nurse Practitioner

Specialization(s):
Adult Health


Family


Pediatrics


Psych / Mental Health


Women's Health


Clinical Nurse Specialist

Specialization(s):
Psych / Mental Health


Psych / Mental Health, Adult


Nurse Anesthetist, Certified Registered


Advanced Practice Midwife


Pharmacists and Pharmacy Technicians

Pharmacist


Other Service Providers

Acupuncturist


Naturopath


Midwife


Epilepsy, Psychiatric, Rehab, and Swing bed Hospital Units

Medicare Defined Swing Bed Unit


Assisted Living, Skilled Nursing, Custodial Care, and Hospice Facilities

Skilled Nursing Facility


Support Agencies

Home Health


Hospice Care, Community Based


Public Health or Welfare


Student, Health Care

Student in an Organized Health Care Education / Training Program


Blood Banks, DME, Pharmacies, and other Supplies

Non-Pharmacy Dispensing Site


Durable Medical Equipment & Medical Supplies

Specialization(s):
Customized Equipment


Hearing Aid Equipment


Pharmacy

Specialization(s):
Community / Retail Pharmacy


Institutional Pharmacy


Clinical Medical, Dental, and Physiological Laboratories

Clinical Medical Laboratory

Specialization(s):










Page Categories:


VermontST JOHNSBURY






Find Doctors:


NPI Search
Psychologists
Dentists
Family Doctor






About:


Privacy Policy
F.A.Q.
Terms of Use


















Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version















Torrence A Wilson - Carbondale, IL | Intelius



























Sign In



We found Torrence A Wilson in Carbondale, IL


Torrence A Wilson

                                                                           Intelius found that Torrence A Wilson  is  a male between 70 and 80 years old from Carbondale, IL.  We have connected them to
                19 addresses,
                3 phones,
                and 8 relatives or associates.
         





Also Known As

Terry A Wilson


Get Report Now

Age

Torrence A Wilson is in his 70s

Torrence Has Lived In

Carbondale, IL
Makanda, IL
Herrin, IL

Torrence's Relatives

Sharon Wilson
Stephen Wilson
Gavin Wilson
Trust Wilson







Torrence A Wilson



Zodiac SignCancer



GenderMale



Professional Status
Network Adminstrator Security Support Specialist at The Cheeper Geekster



Get Report Now










Want to know more about Torrence? Get a comprehensive background report, find full phone numbers, and other contact information when available, all from billions of available public records.
            Continue below for more details about Torrence, or use our people search engine to find others.
Get Background Check on Torrence A Wilson
Get a Criminal Check on Torrence A Wilson
Get a Public Record Report on Torrence A Wilson
Get a People Search Report on Torrence A Wilson


Torrence A Wilson's Contact Information
Known Cities Lived In
Find out where Torrence A Wilson has lived as well as Torrence A Wilson's phone numbers and email addresses.




Torrence A Wilson Has Lived in 1 States
Illinois Address for Torrence A Wilson


2101 W S***** D* 

Carbondale, IL


Has Lived In

Carbondale, IL
Makanda, IL


Get Full Address Report










Phone Numbers Associated with Torrence A Wilson

(618) ***-**** - Carbondale, IL 
(618) ***-**** - Carbondale, IL 
(618) ***-**** - Carbondale, IL 


Get Full Phone Report



Email Addresses Associated with Torrence A Wilson



Get Email Report




Torrence A Wilson's Education Information
Known Schools Attended
Learn about Torrence A Wilson's academic history.  Find out which schools Torrence A Wilson attended, the dates attended as well as the degrees Torrence A Wilson received.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Torrence A Wilson Has Attended 4 Schools
Atlanta Technical College 2009 – 2011               Torrence A Wilson has a Associate, Information Technology, 3.5 in Information Technology               
Atlanta Technical College               2009 – 2011               Torrence A Wilson has a Associate in Information Technology               
DeVry University               1981 – 1983               Torrence A Wilson has a Associates, Electronic Technology in Electronic Technology               
DeVry University               1981 – 1983               Torrence A Wilson has a Associates in Electronic Technology               


Torrence A Wilson's Professional Information
Information regarding Torrence A Wilson's professional history.  Find out previous places Torrence A Wilson has worked as well as dates employed.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Torrence A Wilson Has Worked at 1 Place
Company: The Cheeper Geekster
               Title: Network Adminstrator Security Support Specialist
Torrence A Wilson's Experience
Title: Network Adminstrator Security Support Specialist
               Company: The Cheeper Geekster
Job Details

Additional Professional Information on Torrence A Wilson

 See Torrence A Wilson's LinkedIn Profile



Torrence A Wilson's Social Network and Potential Email Matches
Find out potential social network profiles and potential email usernamed for Torrence A Wilson


Torrence A Wilson's known Social Networks And Potential Email Matches

Find all of Torrence A Wilson's Social Network Profiles

Get Full Report

Search Social Networks
Including Facebook, LinkedIn, MySpace, Google, Twitter, Yahoo, Jigsaw, ZoomInfo and more



Potential Email Matches
Torrence Wilson
Username Matches

                  TorrenceWilson
                  WilsonTorrence
                  Torrence.Wilson
                  Wilson.Torrence
                  Torrence_Wilson
                  Wilson_Torrence
                  Torrence-Wilson
                  Wilson-Torrence
                  TWilson
               


Popular Email Services

@gmail.com
@aol.com
@yahoo.com
@comcast.net
@hotmail.com
@msn.com
@rocketmail.com
@att.net
@sbcglobal.net
@ymail.com
@facebook.com
@mail.com
@bellsouth.net
@live.com
@earthlink.net
@cox.net
@prodigy.net
@me.com
@peoplepc.com
@juno.com
@rediffmail.com
@mindspring.com
@comcast.com
@charter.net
@outlook.com




All trademarks, product names, company names or logos on this page are the property of their respective owners.
Related People Searches
T Wilson







         Intelius is a leading provider of public data about people and their connections to others. Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to determine an individual’s eligibility for credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose covered by the FCRA. For employment or tenant screening services, please visit our partner Talentwise.
      

About Us
Site Map
About Our Reports
Blog
Help
Contact Us

© 2003 – 2017 PeopleConnect, Inc. d/b/a Intelius. All Rights Reserved.
         Privacy Policy - UPDATED
Terms of Service - UPDATED






What is the FCRA?
The Fair Credit Reporting Act ("FCRA") is a federal law that promotes the accuracy, fairness and privacy of information in the files of consumer reporting agencies.
Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the FCRA. Intelius reports cannot be used for background checks related to consumer credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose
                  prohibited under the FCRA.
You may not use any information obtained from Intelius for any purpose covered by the FCRA.
Find out more about the FCRA here.













Vermont Doctors and Health Care Providers City Selection





























Search






Vermont City Selection




Home
 > Vermont



There are 205 cities in Vermont with at least one listing on our site and a total of 10,894 VT Doctors and health care providers. Please select your city in Vermont to view health care professionals near you.

You may also prefer to use our site search via the search box at the top of the page or by clicking this link: Search.Locate Providers in other States:   
	
Choose State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
Dist of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming




Vermont Health Contacts
BankingInsuranceSecurities and Health Care Administration of Vermont(800) 631-7788
Vermont Department of Health(800) 464-4343
State Health Insurance Assistance Program (SHIP)(800) 642-5119
Agency of Human Services of Vermont(800) 250-8427


Skip straight to cities starting with:
A | 
B | 
C | 
D | 
E | 
F | 
G | 
H | 
I | 
J | 
K | 
L | 
M | 
N | 
O | 
P | 
Q | 
R | 
S | 
T | 
U | 
V | 
W | 


A

Alburg
Arlington
Ascutney


B

Barnet
Barre
Barton


Bellow Falls
Bellows Falls
Bennington


Benson
Berlin
Bethel


Bomoseen
Bradford
Brandon


Brattleboro
Bridgewater
Bridport


Bristol
Brookfield
Burlington


C

Cabot
Calais
Cambridge


Canaan
Castleton
Cavendish


Center Rutland
Charlotte
Chelsea


Chester
Chittenden
Colchester


Concord
Cornwall
Craftsbury


Cuttingsville


D

Danville
Derby
Derby Line


Dorset
Dummerston


E

E Dummerston
East Burke
East Calais


East Corinth
East Dorset
East Hardwick


East Montpelier
East Thetford
Enosburg Falls


Essex
Essex Jct
Essex Jct.


Essex Junction


F

Fair Haven
Fairfax
Fairlee


Fayston
Franklin


G

Georgia
Glover
Grafton


Grand Isle
Greensboro
Greensboro Bend


Groton
Guildhall
Guilford


H

Hancock
Hardwick
Hartford


Hartland
Hinesburg
Huntington


Hyde Park


I

Island Pond


J

Jacksonville
Jay
Jeffersonville


Jericho
Johnson


K

Killington


L

Leicester
Lincoln
Londonderry


Lowell
Ludlow
Lyndon


Lyndonville


M

Manchester
Manchester Center
Manchester Ctr


Manchester Village
Marlboro
Marshfield


Mendon
Middlebury
Middlesex


Middletown Springs
Milton
Montpelier


Moretown
Morristown
Morrisville


N

New Haven
Newark
Newbury


Newfane
Newport
Newport Center


North Bennington
North Clarendon
North Ferrisburgh


North Hero
North Springfield
Northfield


Norwich


O

Orleans
Orwell


P

Panton
Pawlet
Perkinsville


Pittsford
Plainfield
Poultney


Putney


Q

Quechee


R

Randolph
Randolph Center
Reading


Richford
Richmond
Rochester


Rutland
Ryegate


S

S Burlington
Saint Albans
Saint Johnsbury


Salisbury
Sandgate
Saxtons River


Shaftsbury
Sharon
Sheffield


Shelburne
Shoreham
So Burlington


So. Burlington
South Birlington
South Burlington


South Hero
South Pomfret
South Royalton


Springfield
St Albans
St Johnsburg


St Johnsbury
St. Albans
St. Johnsbury


Starksboro
Stockbridge
Stowe


Stratton Mt
Sudbury
Sutton


Swanton


T

Taftsville
Townshend


U

Underhill


V

Vergennes
Vernon
Vershire


Virginia Beach


W

Waitsfield
Wallingford
Wardsboro


Warren
Waterbury
Waterbury Center


Waterford
Wells
Wells River


West Dover
West Glover
West Pawlet


West Rutland
West Topsham
Westford


Westminster
Weston
Weybridge


White River Jct
White River Junction
Whitingham


Wilder
Williamstown
Williamsville


Williston
Wilmington
Windsor


Winooski
Wolcott
Woodstock


Worcester







Find Doctors: 
NPI Search
Psychologists
Dentists
Family Doctor




About:
Privacy Policy
F.A.Q.
Terms of Use



















 






Dr. Torrence Wilson - Urologist in St Johnsbury, VT | HealthGrove







 








 






  bterdaswacvufacyyxsxxdxtu






					Hospitals				

					STD Clinics				



				More 





 Search






							Doctors							×














 
















Menu


See All Doctors
Education and TrainingContactSee More DoctorsProfessional InformationPrescribing RecordMore on HealthGrove 








					Torrence Wilson in St Johnsbury, Vermont				


Education and TrainingContactSee More DoctorsMoreProfessional InformationPrescribing RecordMore on HealthGrove 








Torrence Wilson in St Johnsbury, Vermont



Education and Training




Contact




See More Doctors




Professional Information




Prescribing Record




More on HealthGrove




References










 See all Doctors				

 Guide to Choosing a Physician				




Share



















Dr. Torrence M Wilson Urology

 







Address: 1315 Hospital DrSt Johnsbury,  Vermont 05819phone: (802) 748-8141 


Highly Experienced Doctor: 43+ Years ExperiencePrimary Specialty: Urology Medical School: Medical College of Georgia at Georgia Regents UniversityResidency Training: Fitzsimons Army Medical Center - Internal Medicine and Fitzsimons Army Medical Center - Urology 
Run a Background Check on Torrence 

 

Run a Background Check on Torrence 












Advertisement


ShareEducation and TrainingMedical School:



Medical College of Georgia at Georgia Regents University is ranked 106th overall out of all medical schools in our ranking system. Schools are ranked based on admission selectivity, instructional and research excellence, expert opinions, and funding.

Dr. Torrence M Wilson graduated from Medical College of Georgia at Georgia Regents University in 1974. Currently, Dr. Wilson specializes in Urology and has over 43 years experience.






Medical SchoolIDMedical College of Georgia at Georgia Regents University

smart rank106


Residency:

Residency ProgramTrainingIDNpiFitzsimons Army Medical CenterUrologyFitzsimons Army Medical CenterInternal Medicine

Fellowships:Board Certifications:Memberships:Medical Publications:

Ahmed KA,  Davis BJ,  Mynderse LA,  Slezak JM,  Bergstralh EJ,  Wilson TM,  Choo CR. Comparison of biochemical failure rates between permanent prostate brachytherapy and radical retropubic prostatectomy as a function of posttherapy PSA nadir plus 'X'.  2014: PubMed.gov

 





Advertisement


ShareContact and Location

Phone
(802) 748-8141


Address
1315 Hospital DrSt Johnsbury,  Vermont 05819
Dr. Torrence Wilson is one of  2 St Johnsbury Urologists. He  has been practicing for 43 years and specializes primarily in Urology, practicing in St Johnsbury, Vermont. 





Advertisement


ShareSee More Doctors NearbyMore Urologists in the St Johnsbury Area:

Full NameSpecialtyYears of ExperienceMedical SchoolAddressLocationIDTitle FieldStateCityEugene J DixonUrology30Hahnemann Medical College And Hospital - Kansas City1315 Hospital DrSt Johnsbury, Vermont

See All Physicians in St Johnsbury, Vermont › 

 


HealthGrove is a health site that uses Graphiq’s semantic technology to deliver deep insights via data-driven articles, visualizations and research tools.


										Deep insights from health data. Knowledge delivered. ›
									









ShareProfessional InformationLicenseMoreLicense

State License
Minnesota - 31489


NPI
1982684593


 





Advertisement


ShareMedicare Part D Prescribing Record



This section is a breakdown of Dr. Wilson's Medicare prescribing records in 2011. It should be noted that the data may not be representative of Dr. Wilson's entire prescribing pattern. All comparisons are made to the average Urologist in the state.



Average Cost Per Prescription$17 USDBelow the State Average for Urologists ($64 USD)

Prescription Counts by Year

YearTotal Claim CountMedicare Prescription Drug ExpensesState-specialty Average Claim CountIDProvider201023$2,551 USD600.542201115$257 USD668.435



 

 







ShareMore on HealthGroveSubstance Abuse Treatment Centers





IDAnchor TextShepherd Hill Newark OhioCedar Lodge Guntersville AlabamaPacifica House HawthorneBrylin




Substance abuse treatment centers offer services to help people overcome substance abuse. HealthGrove's Treatment Facilities topic can help people find centers based on treatment methods, facilities, payment options, and more.


 





Advertisement





×






References




Sources: CMS, Vendor Sites, SAMHSA, and PubMed. Show details  Hide details  







Was this page helpful?

Yes
No


 

BlkHol Email


Welcome to 
Hi! We see you would like to submit a rating. Please login or create an account to do so. Thank you!


Sign In With




Login with Google




Login with Facebook
 We'll never post without your permission.



Don't have an account?
Sign Up Now




Privacy
Terms & Conditions









						© 2017 Graphiq Inc. All Rights Reserved.
						
Support
Terms
Privacy
Ad Choices and Cookie Policy










 
 




 



Torrence Wilson M.D. - St Johnsbury, VT - Urology




























Search






Torrence Wilson M.D.
Urologist in St Johnsbury Vermont

Home >
Vermont >
St Johnsbury >

Urologist


Profile Overview
Torrence Wilson M.D. is a male health care provider in St Johnsbury, VT with Urologist listed as his primary specialization.  His credentials are: M.D.. His office phone number, address, ratings, services provided, comparisons, and specializations can be viewed below.





Office Location & Contact Information

 Wilson, Torrence  M.D.

1315 HOSPITAL DR
ST JOHNSBURY, VT 05819-9210






View Ratings Survey
 Get Directions
Phone and Fax:
 802-748-8141
 -




View Services
Map and Directions
Ratings and Reviews
Additional Info
Compare Providers







Driving Directions and Map
Looking for mobile or regular driving directions to the office for Torrence Wilson M.D.? View Directions

















Education, Experience, and Specialization(s)

Services:
Torrence Wilson M.D. has 7 services or procedures, including charges submitted to Medicare, available for viewing on our site.Click to view: Services


Health Care Field:
Allopathic & Osteopathic Physicians(Doctors, Physicians, and Surgeons)


Classification:
Urology









Client / Patient Ratings for Torrence Wilson M.D.


Are you a patient of Torrence Wilson M.D. or familiar with their services? Please consider filling out the ratings survey below to help prospective patients make an informed decision.View Full Ratings Survey
Overall:
How would you rate your overall experience? 


Recommend:
How likely would you be to recommend them to a friend or family member? 


Visit Again:
How likely would you be to schedule another appointment should you be in need of services they offer?

View Full Ratings Survey







Additional Information for Torrence Wilson M.D.


Provider Type:
Individual


Gender:
Male


Sole Proprietor:
No


Definition:
Urologist Definition:

A urologist manages benign and malignant medical and surgical disorders of the genitourinary system and the adrenal gland.

 This specialist has comprehensive knowledge of and skills in endoscopic, percutaneous and open surgery of congenital and... 
Full Urologist Definition and Listings



Notes:
A portion of this doctor or health care provider's profile is based on their NPI number (1982684593).
(NPI Final Rule [PDF] from HHS and the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services)
There are 2 additional listings for this city.




Additional:
Click to Update / Correct / Add Information(such as website, office hours, insurance accepted, appointment scheduling etc.)









Compare Torrence Wilson M.D.


The following are a few ways you can compare nearby doctors and health care providers to find the right match for your care needs. You may also be interested in trying a new Search. Thank you for taking the time to visit us!
View Similar Profiles in St JohnsburyThe doctors and health care providers below offer similar services as Torrence Wilson M.D. in St Johnsbury. Profiles may also include costs for specific services and procedures, common referrals, ratings, and reviews. 
Dr. Dixon, Eugene M.D.


Urologist Providers in Nearby Cities

Morrisville
Barre
Saint Albans


Burlington
White River Junction
Rutland













Page Categories:

VermontSt Johnsbury Urologist







Find Doctors:

NPI Search
Psychologists
Dentists
Family Doctor





About:

Privacy Policy
F.A.Q.
Terms of Use





© 2011 - 2017 eHealthScores is a free doctor and healthcare provider review and rating site designed to help residents of St Johnsbury and people throughout the United States find their care match. Patients and providers are encouraged to help others by submitting opening hours, forms of insurance, and appointment details.










St Johnsbury Vermont Urologist Providers




























Search







Urologist
 Providers in St Johnsbury





Home



 > 


Vermont



 > 


St Johnsbury



 > 
Urologist









There are 2 listings for 
Allopathic & Osteopathic Physicians, Urology located in St Johnsbury, Vermont. Profile pages include contact information, office numbers, services offered, ratings, and directions. Having trouble finding a listing for the provider you are searching for? We suggest trying our search tool via the search link above.




Provider Name, Office, and Phone


Dr. Eugene Dixon M.D.
1315 Hospital Dr - Nvrh Surgical Group - 05819 - St Johnsbury, VT
 - (802) 748-8141


Torrence Wilson M.D.
1315 Hospital Dr -  - 05819 - St Johnsbury, VT
 - (802) 748-8141






Page Categories:
Vermont St Johnsbury




Find Doctors: 
NPI Search
Psychologists
Dentists
Family Doctor




About:
Privacy Policy
F.A.Q.
Terms of Use













Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft


















Wilson M. Torrence - Executive Bio, Compensation History, and Contacts - Equilar Atlas










 

















Log in | Sign up








x

 






As Featured In



















Wilson M. Torrence
Board Member at Alliance Resource Partners LP


View Full Profile
Are you Wilson M. Torrence? Claim your profile


 


Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Wilson M. Torrence's full profile. 
With Equilar Atlas, you can:



IDENTIFY corporate executives in Wilson M. Torrence's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Wilson M. Torrence's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Wilson M. Torrence through your network of contacts.
												








Wilson M. Torrence's Executive Work History


Current


Board Member, 
Alliance Resource Partners LP


Past
To view Wilson M. Torrence's complete executive work history, sign up now
Age
75

 
 


Wilson M. Torrence's Biography



Wilson M. Torrence became a Director in January 2007.  Mr. Torrence is Chairman of the Audit Committee and a member of the Compensation Committee.  Mr. Torrence is also a Director and Chairman of the Audit Committee of AGP, the general partner of AHGP.  Mr. Torrence retired from Fluor Corporation in 2006 as a Senior Vice President of Project Development and Investments and since that time has performed investment and business consulting services for various clients.  Mr. Torrence was employed at Fluor from 1989 to 2006 where, among other roles, he was responsible for the global Project Investment and Structured Finance Group and served as Cha ...
(Read More)

			Wilson M. Torrence became a Director in January 2007.  Mr. Torrence is Chairman of the Audit Committee and a member of the Compensation Committee.  Mr. Torrence is also a Director and Chairman of the Audit Committee of AGP, the general partner of AHGP.  Mr. Torrence retired from Fluor Corporation in 2006 as a Senior Vice President of Project Development and Investments and since that time has performed investment and business consulting services for various clients.  Mr. Torrence was employed at Fluor from 1989 to 2006 where, among other roles, he was responsible for the global Project Investment and Structured Finance Group and served as Chairman of Fluor's Investment Committee.  In that position, Mr. Torrence had executive responsibility for Fluor's global activities in developing and arranging third-party financing for some of Fluor's clients' construction projects.  Prior to joining Fluor in 1989, Mr. Torrence was President and CEO of Combustion Engineering Corporation's Waste to Energy Division and, during that time, also served as Chairman of the Institute of Resource Recovery, a Washington-based industry advocacy organization.  Mr. Torrence began his career at Mobil Oil Corporation, where he held several executive positions, including Assistant Treasurer of Mobil's International Marketing and Refining Division and Chief Financial and Planning Officer of Mobil Land Development Company.  Mr. Torrence holds a Bachelor and a Master of Business Administration degree from Virginia Tech University.  The specific experience, qualifications, attributes or skills that led to the conclusion Mr. Torrence should serve as a Director include his extensive experience in the construction and energy businesses, his senior corporate finance-related and other leadership positions and his participation in numerous financing transactions.
		
Source: Alliance Resource Partners LP on 02/24/2017
		
	

 






Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Wilson M. Torrence's full profile. 



												By accessing Equilar Atlas, you can view bios, network, salary and wealth events
												of industry-leading executives like Wilson M. Torrence. More specifically, you'll be able to:
												

IDENTIFY corporate executives in Wilson M. Torrence's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Wilson M. Torrence's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Wilson M. Torrence through your network of conections.
												




View Full Profile


 








Search for over 360,000 executive profiles.





/bio



													Example: Wilson M. Torrence


















Wilson M. Torrence's Connections (16)





Sign up now to view Wilson M. Torrence's 16 connections »









Thomas M. Wynne
Senior Vice President and Chief Operating Officer, Alliance Resource Partners LP









R. Eberley Davis
Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary, Alliance Resource Partners LP









Joseph W. Craft
Dir., President and Chief Executive Officer, Alliance Resource Partners LP









Michael J. Hall
Chairman, Matrix Service Company









Robert J. Druten
Board Member, EPR Properties









Nick Carter
Board Member, Alliance Resource Partners LP









John P. Neafsey
Director, Alliance Resource Partners LP









Brian L. Cantrell
Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer, Alliance Resource Partners LP









Robert G. Sachse
Executive Vice President, Marketing, Alliance Resource Partners LP









Merribel S. Ayres
Former Board Member, CMS Energy








Popular Profiles






														Sign up now to view more executive profiles »
														









Thomas J. Lynch
Executive Chairman, TE Connectivity Ltd.









John J. Kita
EVP and CFO, A. O. Smith









Carl G. Annessa
EVP and COO, Hornbeck Offshore Services, Inc.









Elon R. Musk
CEO and Chairman, Tesla









Michael C. Montgomery
Board Member, NMI Holdings, Inc.












×

Claim Your Profile Coming Soon
Interested in updating your biography and work history?
We're working on making it happen.
We'll email you when this feature is available.
Please enter valid email address.

Done


Thank you for your interest.
Ok






			Browse executive profiles:
			
				 A
			
				 B
			
				 C
			
				 D
			
				 E
			
				 F
			
				 G
			
				 H
			
				 I
			
				 J
			
				 K
			
				 L
			
				 M
			
				 N
			
				 O
			
				 P
			
				 Q
			
				 R
			
				 S
			
				 T
			
				 U
			
				 V
			
				 W
			
				 X
			
				 Y
			
				 Z



Equilar Homepage
Equilar Atlas
Equilar Insight
Equilar BoardEdge
Equilar Engage
Research Services
Knowledge Network
About Us
Login

ï¿½ 2017 Equilar All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy
1100 Marshall Street, Redwood City, CA 94063 | Phone (650) 241-6600 | Fax (650) 701-0993
















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Wilson Torrence MD                                                                                                       - Rochester                                         , MN         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



MN



Rochester



offices and Clinics of Medical Doctors



Physicians' Office, Including Specialists



                            Wilson Torrence MD
                                    



 





















W 


Wilson Torrence MD                                                                                                      
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



2300 HARDWOOD CT SW ROCHESTER, MN 55902
Get Directions



(507) 288-3368
www.zimmer.com                                                                                          





Business Info



 Founded 2007
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $116,079.00
 Employee Count 3
 Industries Physicians' Office, Including Specialists
 Contacts Torrence Wilson                                                                                                         







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Wilson Torrence Md                                                                                                       is located at 2300 Hardwood Ct Sw in Rochester and has been in the business of Physicians' Office, Including Specialists since 2007. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







W

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.
























Doctors in Rochester, MN | Doctor.com





















































 



















yzftfdvarwsfvvwws












Marketing automation for healthcare













 Log-in to Doctor.com






Email:


Password:





Don't have an account?
Sign Up Now


Forgot your password?
Reset it Here









Request a Free Demo







Please enter a first name.



Please enter a last name.



Please enter a valid email address.



Please enter a valid phone number.














Submitting...


Or  Call Now (888) 666-8161








Thank you!


        We're currently processing your request and we'll be in touch soon. For a faster response, please call us directly at 888-666-8135.
    






Doctor.com ProfilePoints™


ProfilePoints™ measure the overall completeness of a
        provider's profile, including items like having a photo, a biography,
        insurance, payment options, etc. A full breakdown of points can be seen
        by providers with Doctor.com accounts when editing their profile on Doctor.com.
        
By showing providers with higher ProfilePoints™ first,
        we make it easier for you to quickly identify the most informative profiles on Doctor.com
        







Find Rochester, MN Doctors

        Go to Provider Search
    













Use the links below to start your search
Doctor.com can help you find a local physician or other licensed health
                provider in Rochester, MN who accepts your insurance
                and is best-suited to meet your needs. 















Providers in Rochester, MN on Doctor.com

Top 10 Provider Specialties in Rochester, MN:

Internist (781 providers)Nurse Practitioner (NP) (557 providers)Radiologist (410 providers)Anesthesiologist (343 providers)Surgeon (320 providers)Cardiologist (Heart Specialist) (309 providers)Pediatrician (Kids / Children Specialist) (270 providers)Pathologist (262 providers)Orthopedic Surgeon (250 providers)Nurse Anesthetist (246 providers)
Top 10 Most Popular Insurances for Rochester, MN Doctors:

AetnaBlueCross BlueShieldCignaMultiplan PHCSUnited Health CareHumana HealthBlueCross BlueShieldMedicareMedicaidAssurant Health
﻿﻿Aggregate Statistics 

Total number of Rochester, MN doctors (and other providers) on Doctor.com:7369Most popular Medical Specialty of Providers in Rochester, MN:InternistRochester, MN Doctors have been Practicing for an Average of:20.2 year(s)Average ProfilePoints™ Score for Providers in Rochester, MN:31/80Average Overall User Rating for Providers in Rochester, MN:4 (out of 5) 

Rochester, MN Doctors by Zip Code

559015590255903559045590555906 



















﻿﻿















  
















Doctors in Minnesota | Doctor.com





















































 



















cqswrcsaewrwasvwcudyqsdaaasxqfe












Marketing automation for healthcare













 Log-in to Doctor.com






Email:


Password:





Don't have an account?
Sign Up Now


Forgot your password?
Reset it Here









Request a Free Demo







Please enter a first name.



Please enter a last name.



Please enter a valid email address.



Please enter a valid phone number.














Submitting...


Or  Call Now (888) 666-8161








Thank you!


        We're currently processing your request and we'll be in touch soon. For a faster response, please call us directly at 888-666-8135.
    






Doctor.com ProfilePoints™


ProfilePoints™ measure the overall completeness of a
        provider's profile, including items like having a photo, a biography,
        insurance, payment options, etc. A full breakdown of points can be seen
        by providers with Doctor.com accounts when editing their profile on Doctor.com.
        
By showing providers with higher ProfilePoints™ first,
        we make it easier for you to quickly identify the most informative profiles on Doctor.com
        







Find Minnesota Doctors

        Go to Provider Search
    













Use the links below to start your search
Doctor.com can help you find a doctor in Minnesota
                who is well matched to your needs and preferences. We have detailed profile and
                thousands of user ratings and reviews for more than 2 million health care
                providers in the United States. 















Providers in Minnesota on Doctor.com


Top 10 Provider Specialties in Minnesota:

Nurse Practitioner (NP) (4780 providers)Dentist (3833 providers)Family Doctor (3786 providers)Psychologist (3621 providers)Physical Therapist (PT) (3218 providers)Social Worker (3208 providers)Internist (2908 providers)Chiropractor (2880 providers)Pharmacist (2664 providers)Counselor (2587 providers)
Top 10 Most Popular Insurances for Minnesota Doctors:

AetnaBlueCross BlueShieldCignaUnited Health CareBlueCross BlueShieldHumana HealthMultiplan PHCSCoventryMedicareMedicaid
﻿﻿Aggregate Statistics 

Total number of Minnesota doctors (and other providers) on Doctor.com:58805Most popular Medical Specialty of Providers in Minnesota:Nurse Practitioner (NP)Minnesota Doctors have been Practicing for an Average of:21.9 year(s)Average ProfilePoints™ Score for Providers in Minnesota:29/80Average Overall User Rating for Providers in Minnesota:4 (out of 5) 

Minnesota Doctors by City

Ada, MNAdams, MNAdolph, MNAdrian, MNAfton, MNAh Gwah Ching, MNAitkin, MNAkeley, MNAlbany, MNAlbert Lea, MNAlberta, MNAlbertville, MNAlborn, MNAlden, MNAldrich, MNAlexandria, MNAlmelund, MNAlpha, MNAltura, MNAlvarado, MNAmboy, MNAndover, MNAngle Inlet, MNAngora, MNAnnandale, MNAnoka, MNAppleton, MNArco, MNArgyle, MNArlington, MNAshby, MNAskov, MNAtwater, MNAudubon, MNAurora, MNAustin, MNAvoca, MNAvon, MNBabbitt, MNBackus, MNBadger, MNBagley, MNBalaton, MNBarnesville, MNBarnum, MNBarrett, MNBarry, MNBattle Lake, MNBaudette, MNBaxter, MNBayport, MNBeardsley, MNBeaver Bay, MNBeaver Creek, MNBecker, MNBejou, MNBelgrade, MNBelle Plaine, MNBellingham, MNBeltrami, MNBelview, MNBemidji, MNBena, MNBenedict, MNBenson, MNBertha, MNBethel, MNBig Falls, MNBig Lake, MNBigelow, MNBigfork, MNBingham Lake, MNBirchdale, MNBird Island, MNBiwabik, MNBlackduck, MNBlomkest, MNBlooming Prairie, MNBloomington, MNBlue Earth, MNBluffton, MNBock, MNBorup, MNBovey, MNBowlus, MNBowstring, MNBoyd, MNBraham, MNBrainerd, MNBrandon, MNBreckenridge, MNBrewster, MNBricelyn, MNBrimson, MNBritt, MNBrook Park, MNBrooks, MNBrookston, MNBrooten, MNBrowerville, MNBrowns Valley, MNBrownsdale, MNBrownsville, MNBrownton, MNBruno, MNBuckman, MNBuffalo, MNBuffalo Lake, MNBuhl, MNBurnsville, MNBurtrum, MNButterfield, MNByron, MNCaledonia, MNCallaway, MNCalumet, MNCambridge, MNCampbell, MNCanby, MNCannon Falls, MNCanton, MNCanyon, MNCarlos, MNCarlton, MNCarver, MNCass Lake, MNCastle Rock, MNCedar, MNCenter City, MNCeylon, MNChamplin, MNChandler, MNChanhassen, MNChaska, MNChatfield, MNChisago City, MNChisholm, MNChokio, MNCircle Pines, MNClara City, MNClaremont, MNClarissa, MNClarkfield, MNClarks Grove, MNClear Lake, MNClearbrook, MNClearwater, MNClements, MNCleveland, MNClimax, MNClinton, MNClitherall, MNClontarf, MNCloquet, MNCohasset, MNCokato, MNCold Spring, MNColeraine, MNCollegeville, MNCologne, MNComfrey, MNComstock, MNConger, MNCook, MNCOON RAPIDS, MNCorcoran, MNCorrell, MNCosmos, MNCottage Grove, MNCotton, MNCottonwood, MNCourtland, MNCrane Lake, MNCromwell, MNCrookston, MNCrosby, MNCrosslake, MNCrystal Bay, MNCurrie, MNCushing, MNCyrus, MNDakota, MNDalbo, MNDalton, MNDanube, MNDanvers, MNDarfur, MNDarwin, MNDassel, MNDawson, MNDayton, MNDeer Creek, MNDeer River, MNDeerwood, MNDelano, MNDelavan, MNDennison, MNDent, MNDetroit Lakes, MNDexter, MNDilworth, MNDodge Center, MNDonaldson, MNDonnelly, MNDover, MNDovray, MNDuluth, MNDumont, MNDundas, MNDunnell, MNEagan, MNEagle Bend, MNEagle Lake, MNEast Grand Forks, MNEaston, MNEcho, MNEden Prairie, MNEden Valley, MNEdgerton, MNEDINA, MNEffie, MNEitzen, MNElbow Lake, MNElgin, MNElizabeth, MNElk River, MNElko, MNElkton, MNEllendale, MNEllsworth, MNElmore, MNElrosa, MNEly, MNElysian, MNEmbarrass, MNEmily, MNEmmons, MNErhard, MNErskine, MNEsko, MNEssig, MNEuclid, MNEvansville, MNEveleth, MNExcelsior, MNEyota, MNFairfax, MNFairmont, MNFaribault, MNFarmington, MNFarwell, MNFederal Dam, MNFelton, MNFergus Falls, MNFertile, MNFifty Lakes, MNFinland, MNFinlayson, MNFisher, MNFlensburg, MNFlom, MNFloodwood, MNFoley, MNForbes, MNForest Lake, MNForeston, MNFort Ripley, MNFosston, MNFountain, MNFoxhome, MNFranklin, MNFrazee, MNFreeborn, MNFreeport, MNFridley, MNFrontenac, MNFrost, MNFulda, MNGarden City, MNGarfield, MNGarrison, MNGarvin, MNGary, MNGatzke, MNGaylord, MNGeneva, MNGeorgetown, MNGhent, MNGibbon, MNGilbert, MNGilman, MNGlencoe, MNGlenville, MNGlenwood, MNGlyndon, MNGonvick, MNGood Thunder, MNGoodhue, MNGoodland, MNGoodridge, MNGraceville, MNGranada, MNGrand Marais, MNGrand Meadow, MNGrand Portage, MNGrand Rapids, MNGrandy, MNGranite Falls, MNGrasston, MNGreen Isle, MNGreenbush, MNGreenwald, MNGrey Eagle, MNGrove City, MNGrygla, MNGully, MNHackensack, MNHallock, MNHalma, MNHalstad, MNHamburg, MNHamel, MNHampton, MNHancock, MNHanley Falls, MNHanover, MNHanska, MNHardwick, MNHarmony, MNHarris, MNHartland, MNHastings, MNHawley, MNHayfield, MNHayward, MNHector, MNHenderson, MNHendricks, MNHendrum, MNHenning, MNHenriette, MNHerman, MNHeron Lake, MNHewitt, MNHibbing, MNHill City, MNHillman, MNHills, MNHinckley, MNHines, MNHitterdal, MNHoffman, MNHokah, MNHoldingford, MNHolland, MNHollandale, MNHolloway, MNHolmes City, MNHolyoke, MNHomer, MNHope, MNHopkins, MNHouston, MNHovland, MNHoward Lake, MNHoyt Lakes, MNHugo, MNHumboldt, MNHuntley, MNHutchinson, MNIhlen, MNInternational Falls, MNInver Grove Heights, MNIona, MNIron, MNIronton, MNIsabella, MNIsanti, MNIsle, MNIvanhoe, MNJackson, MNJacobson, MNJanesville, MNJasper, MNJeffers, MNJenkins, MNJordan, MNKabetogama, MNKanaranzi, MNKandiyohi, MNKarlstad, MNKasota, MNKasson, MNKeewatin, MNKelliher, MNKellogg, MNKennedy, MNKenneth, MNKensington, MNKent, MNKenyon, MNKerkhoven, MNKerrick, MNKettle River, MNKiester, MNKilkenny, MNKimball, MNKinney, MNKnife River, MNLa Crescent, MNLa Salle, MNLafayette, MNLake Benton, MNLake Bronson, MNLake City, MNLake Crystal, MNLake Elmo, MNLake George, MNLake Hubert, MNLake Lillian, MNLake Park, MNLake Wilson, MNLakefield, MNLakeland, MNLakeville, MNLamberton, MNLancaster, MNLanesboro, MNLansing, MNLaporte, MNLastrup, MNLe Center, MNLe Roy, MNLe Sueur, MNLengby, MNLeonard, MNLeota, MNLester Prairie, MNLewiston, MNLewisville, MNLindstrom, MNLismore, MNLitchfield, MNLittle Falls, MNLittlefork, MNLoman, MNLong Lake, MNLong Prairie, MNLongville, MNLonsdale, MNLoretto, MNLowry, MNLucan, MNLutsen, MNLuverne, MNLyle, MNLynd, MNMabel, MNMadelia, MNMadison, MNMadison Lake, MNMagnolia, MNMahnomen, MNMakinen, MNMankato, MNMantorville, MNMAPLE GROVE, MNMaple Lake, MNMaple Plain, MNMapleton, MNMaplewood, MNMarble, MNMarcell, MNMargie, MNMarietta, MNMarine On Saint Croix, MNMarshall, MNMax, MNMayer, MNMaynard, MNMazeppa, MNMc Grath, MNMcgrath, MNMcgregor, MNMcintosh, MNMeadowlands, MNMedford, MNMelrose, MNMelrude, MNMenahga, MNMendota, MNMentor, MNMerrifield, MNMiddle River, MNMilaca, MNMilan, MNMillville, MNMilroy, MNMiltona, MNMinneapolis, MNMinneota, MNMinnesota City, MNMinnesota Lake, MNMinnetonka, MNMinnetonka Beach, MNMizpah, MNMontevideo, MNMontgomery, MNMonticello, MNMontrose, MNMoorhead, MNMoose Lake, MNMora, MNMorgan, MNMorris, MNMorristown, MNMorton, MNMotley, MNMound, MNMountain Iron, MNMountain Lake, MNMurdock, MNNashua, MNNashwauk, MNNavarre, MNNaytahwaush, MNNelson, MNNerstrand, MNNett Lake, MNNevis, MNNew Auburn, MNNew Germany, MNNew Hope, MNNew London, MNNew Market, MNNew Munich, MNNew Prague, MNNew Richland, MNNew Ulm, MNNew York Mills, MNNewfolden, MNNewport, MNNicollet, MNNielsville, MNNimrod, MNNisswa, MNNorcross, MNNorth Branch, MNNorthfield, MNNorthome, MNNorthrop, MNNorwood, MNNorwood Young America, MNNoyes, MNOak Island, MNOak Park, MNOakdale, MNOdessa, MNOdin, MNOgema, MNOgilvie, MNOkabena, MNOklee, MNOlivia, MNOnamia, MNOrmsby, MNOronoco, MNOrr, MNOrtonville, MNOsage, MNOsakis, MNOslo, MNOsseo, MNOstrander, MNOther, MNOttertail, MNOuting, MNOwatonna, MNPalisade, MNPark Rapids, MNParkers Prairie, MNPaynesville, MNPease, MNPelican Rapids, MNPemberton, MNPengilly, MNPennington, MNPennock, MNPequot Lakes, MNPerham, MNPerley, MNPeterson, MNPierz, MNPillager, MNPine City, MNPine Island, MNPine River, MNPipestone, MNPlainview, MNPlato, MNPlummer, MNPonemah, MNPonsford, MNPorter, MNPreston, MNPrinceton, MNPrinsburg, MNPrior Lake, MNPuposky, MNRacine, MNRandall, MNRandolph, MNRanier, MNRaymond, MNReading, MNReads Landing, MNRed Lake Falls, MNRed Wing, MNRedby, MNRedlake, MNRedwood Falls, MNRemer, MNRenville, MNRevere, MNRice, MNRichfield, MNRichmond, MNRichville, MNRichwood, MNROBBINSDALE, MNRochert, MNRochester, MNRock Creek, MNRockford, MNRockville, MNRogers, MNRollingstone, MNRoosevelt, MNRoscoe, MNRose Creek, MNRoseau, MNRosemount, MNRothsay, MNRound Lake, MNRoyalton, MNRush City, MNRushford, MNRushmore, MNRussell, MNRuthton, MNSabin, MNSacred Heart, MNSaginaw, MNSaint Bonifacius, MNSaint Charles, MNSaint Clair, MNSaint Cloud, MNSaint Francis, MNSaint Hilaire, MNSaint James, MNSaint Joseph, MNSAINT LOUIS PARK, MNSaint Martin, MNSaint Michael, MNSaint Paul, MNSaint Paul Park, MNSaint Peter, MNSaint Stephen, MNSaint Vincent, MNSalol, MNSanborn, MNSandstone, MNSantiago, MNSargeant, MNSartell, MNSauk Centre, MNSauk Rapids, MNSavage, MNSawyer, MNScandia, MNSchroeder, MNSeaforth, MNSearles, MNSebeka, MNShafer, MNShakopee, MNShelly, MNSherburn, MNShevlin, MNShoreview, MNSide Lake, MNSilver Bay, MNSilver Creek, MNSilver Lake, MNSlayton, MNSleepy Eye, MNSolway, MNSoudan, MNSouth Haven, MNSouth International Falls, MNSouth Saint Paul, MNSpicer, MNSpring Grove, MNSpring Lake, MNSpring Park, MNSpring Valley, MNSpringfield, MNSquaw Lake, MNStacy, MNStanchfield, MNStaples, MNStarbuck, MNSteen, MNStephen, MNStewart, MNStewartville, MNStillwater, MNStockton, MNStorden, MNStrandquist, MNStrathcona, MNSturgeon Lake, MNSunburg, MNSwan River, MNSwanville, MNSwatara, MNSwift, MNTaconite, MNTalmoon, MNTamarack, MNTaopi, MNTaunton, MNTaylors Falls, MNTenstrike, MNThief River Falls, MNTintah, MNTofte, MNTower, MNTracy, MNTrail, MNTrimont, MNTrosky, MNTruman, MNTwig, MNTwin Lakes, MNTwin Valley, MNTwo Harbors, MNTyler, MNUlen, MNUnderwood, MNUpsala, MNUtica, MNVergas, MNVermillion, MNVerndale, MNVernon Center, MNVesta, MNVictoria, MNViking, MNVillard, MNVining, MNVirginia, MNWabasha, MNWabasso, MNWaconia, MNWadena, MNWahkon, MNWaite Park, MNWaldorf, MNWalker, MNWalnut Grove, MNWaltham, MNWanamingo, MNWanda, MNWannaska, MNWarba, MNWarren, MNWarroad, MNWarsaw, MNWaseca, MNWaskish, MNWatertown, MNWaterville, MNWatkins, MNWatson, MNWaubun, MNWaverly, MNWayzata, MNWebster, MNWelch, MNWelcome, MNWells, MNWendell, MNWest Concord, MNWest Union, MNWestbrook, MNWheaton, MNWhite Earth, MNWillernie, MNWilliams, MNWillmar, MNWillow River, MNWilmont, MNWilton, MNWindom, MNWinger, MNWinnebago, MNWinona, MNWinsted, MNWinthrop, MNWinton, MNWirt, MNWolf Lake, MNWolverton, MNWood Lake, MNWOODBURY, MNWoodstock, MNWorthington, MNWrenshall, MNWright, MNWykoff, MNWyoming, MNYoung America, MNZimmerman, MNZumbro Falls, MNZumbrota, MN 



















            ﻿﻿















  

















Doctors in  10 miles of New York, NY  | Doctor.com









































































cqswrcsaewrwasvwcudyqsdaaasxqfe












Marketing automation for healthcare













 Log-in to Doctor.com






Email:


Password:





Don't have an account?
Sign Up Now


Forgot your password?
Reset it Here









Request a Free Demo







Please enter a first name.



Please enter a last name.



Please enter a valid email address.



Please enter a valid phone number.














Submitting...


Or  Call Now (888) 666-8161








Thank you!


        We're currently processing your request and we'll be in touch soon. For a faster response, please call us directly at 888-666-8135.
    






Doctor.com ProfilePoints™


ProfilePoints™ measure the overall completeness of a
        provider's profile, including items like having a photo, a biography,
        insurance, payment options, etc. A full breakdown of points can be seen
        by providers with Doctor.com accounts when editing their profile on Doctor.com.
        
By showing providers with higher ProfilePoints™ first,
        we make it easier for you to quickly identify the most informative profiles on Doctor.com
        








Refine Search





Specialty

Any Specialty
Acupuncturist (Alternative Medicine)Addiction Medicine SpecialistAdolescent Medicine SpecialistAllergist-ImmunologistAllergyClinical & Laboratory ImmunologyAnaplastologistAnesthesiologistAddiction MedicineCritical Care MedicineHospice & Palliative MedicinePain MedicinePediatric AnesthesiologistArt TherapistAudiologistAssistive Technology PractitionerAssistive Technology SupplierHearing Aid FitterBariatrician (Weight Loss Specialist)Bariatric Medicine (Bariatrician)Cardiologist (Heart Specialist)Clinical Cardiac ElectrophysiologyCertified Nurse MidwifeCertified Respiratory Therapist (CRT)Critical CareEducationalEmergency CareGeneral CareGeriatric CareHome HealthNeonatal/PediatricsPalliative/HospicePatient TransportPulmonary DiagnosticsPulmonary Function TechnologyPulmonary RehabilitationSNF/Subacute CareChiropractorIndependent Medical ExaminationInternistNeurologyNutritionOccupational MedicineOrthopedicPediatricRadiologyRehabilitationSports MedicineThermographyClinical / Laboratory ImmunologistClinical NeuropsychologistClinical Nurse Specialist (CNS)Acute CareAdult HealthChronic CareCommunity Health/Public HealthCritical Care MedicineEmergencyEthicsFamily HealthGerontologyHolisticHome HealthInformaticsLong-Term CareMedical-SurgicalNeonatalNeuroscienceOccupational HealthOncologyOncology, PediatricsPediatricsPerinatalPerioperativePsych/Mental HealthPsych/Mental Health, AdultPsych/Mental Health, Child & AdolescentPsych/Mental Health, Child & FamilyPsych/Mental Health, Chronically IllPsych/Mental Health, CommunityPsych/Mental Health, GeropsychiatricRehabilitationSchoolTransplantationWomen's HealthClinical PharmacologistColon & Rectal Surgeon (Proctologist)Concierge MedicineCounselorAddiction & Substance Use DisorderMental HealthPastoralProfessionalSchoolCritical Care SpecialistDoctor of Critical Care MedicineDance TherapistDentistCosmetic DentistDental Public HealthEndodontics (Endodontist)Family and Cosmetic DentistOral & Maxillofacial RadiologyOral & Maxillofacial SurgeryOral and Maxillofacial PathologyOrthodontics & Dentofacial Orthopedics (Orthodontist)Pediatric DentistPeriodontal and Implant Surgery SpecialistPeriodontics (Periodontist)Primary Dental CareProsthodontics (Prosthodontist)Denturist (Dentures Specialist)Dermatologist (Skin Specialist)Clinical & Laboratory Dermatological ImmunologyCosmetic DermatologyDermatopathologyHair Loss and Hair Restoration ExpertMOHS-Micrographic SurgeryPediatric DermatologyProcedural DermatologistDevelopmental TherapistDietary ManagerDietitianMetabolic NutritionPediatric NutritionRenal NutritionEmergency DoctorEmergency Medical Services (EMS)Hospice & Palliative MedicineMedical ToxicologyPediatric Emergency MedicineSports MedicineUndersea & Hyperbaric MedicineEndocrinologist (Diabetes & Hormones Specialist)Family DoctorAddiction MedicineAdolescent MedicineAdult MedicineBariatric MedicineGeriatric MedicineHospice & Palliative MedicineMedical AestheticsSports MedicineGastroenterologist (Stomach & Bowel Specialist)General Practice Doctor (General Practitioner)Aesthetic MedicineHair Loss and Hair Restoration ExpertIntegrative MedicineGeriatric Medicine DoctorHearing Instrument SpecialistHematology / Oncology SpecialistHematologist (Blood)Oncologist (Cancer)Hepatologist (Liver, Gallbladder & Pancreas)Homeopath (Alternative Medicine)Hospice & Palliative Medicine SpecialistHospice & Palliative SurgeonHospitalistIndependent Medical ExaminerInfectious Disease SpecialistInternistAesthetic MedicineInterventional CardiologistKinesiotherapistLegal Medicine SpecialistLicensed Physchiatric Technician (LPT)Licensed Practical Nurse (LPN)Licensed Skin Care SpecialistLicensed Vocational Nurse (LVN)Magnetic Resonance Imaging (MRI) SpecialistMarriage & Family TherapistMassage TherapistLicensed Massage TherapistMechanotherapistMedical GeneticistClinical GeneticsGenetic Counselor, MSMedical GeneticsMedical Genetics, Ph.D. Medical GeneticsMolecular Genetic PathologyMedical Geneticist (Genetic & Hereditary Disease Specialist) Clinical Biochemical GeneticsClinical CytogeneticsClinical Molecular GeneticsMusic TherapistNaprapath (Alternative Medicine)Naturopath (Alternative Medicine)Nephrologist (Kidney Specialist)Neurological SurgeonNeurologistDiagnostic NeuroimagingNeurodevelopmental DisabilitiesNeuromuscular MedicinePain MedicineSpecial Qualifications in Child NeurologyVascular NeurologyNeuromusculoskeletal Medicine SpecialistOsteopathic Manual ManipulationSports MedicineNuclear Medicine SpecialistIn Vivo & In Vitro Nuclear MedicineNuclear CardiologyNuclear Imaging & TherapyNurse AnesthetistNurse Practitioner (NP)Acute CareAdult HealthCommunity HealthCritical Care MedicineDermatologyFamilyGerontologyNeonatalNeonatal, Critical CareObstetrics & GynecologyOccupational HealthPediatricsPediatrics, Critical CarePerinatalPrimary CarePsych/Mental HealthSchoolWomen's HealthNutrition CounselingNutritionistObstetrician / Gynecologist (OBGYN)Bariatric MedicineCritical Care MedicineGynecologic OncologyGynecologyHospice & Palliative MedicineInfertility and Cosmetic SurgeryMaternal & Fetal MedicineObstetricsReproductive EndocrinologyOccupational Therapist (OT)Driving and Community MobilityEnvironmental ModificationErgonomicsFeeding, Eating & SwallowingGerontologyHand SpecialistHuman FactorsLow VisionMental HealthNeurorehabilitationPediatricsPhysical RehabilitationOphthalmologist (Eye Doctor)Optometrist (Eye & Vision Specialist)Corneal and Contact ManagementLow Vision RehabilitationOccupational VisionPediatricsSports VisionVision TherapyOrthopedic SurgeonAdult Reconstructive Orthopaedic SurgeryFoot & Ankle SurgeryHand SurgeryOrthopaedic TraumaPediatric Orthopaedic SurgerySports MedicineSurgery of the SpineOrthotics/Prosthetics FitterOrthotistOther DoctorsSpecialistOther Healthcare ProfessionalAestheticianDental HygienistOtolaryngologist (Ear, Nose & Throat - ENT)Facial Plastic & Reconstructive SurgeryFacial Plastic SurgeryHead & Neck Oncology SurgeryMicrovascular ReconstructionOtolaryngic AllergyOtology & NeurotologyPediatric OtolaryngologySinusSinus & Skull Base SurgerySinus SurgerySkull Base SurgerySleep & SnoringSleep MedicineThyroid/ParathyroidPain Medicine SpecialistPathologistAnatomic PathologyAnatomic Pathology & Clinical PathologyBlood Banking & Transfusion MedicineChemical PathologyClinical PathologyClinical Pathology/Laboratory MedicineCytopathologyDermatopathologyForensic PathologyHematologyImmunopathologyMedical MicrobiologyMolecular Genetic PathologyNeuropathologyPediatric PathologyPediatrician (Kids / Children Specialist)Adolescent MedicineClinical & Laboratory ImmunologyDevelopmental - Behavioral PediatricsHospice & Palliative MedicineMedical ToxicologyNeonatal-Perinatal MedicineNeurodevelopmental DisabilitiesPediatric Allergy & ImmunologyPediatric CardiologyPediatric Critical Care MedicinePediatric Emergency MedicinePediatric EndocrinologyPediatric GastroenterologyPediatric Hematology-OncologyPediatric Infectious DiseasesPediatric NephrologyPediatric PulmonologyPediatric RheumatologyPediatric Transplant HepatologySleep MedicineSports MedicinePharmacistPharmacist Clinician (PhC)/ Clinical PharmacistPharmacist Clinician (PhC)/ Clinical Pharmacy SpecialistPharmacotherapistPharmacotherapyPhlebologist (Vein Specialist)Physiatrist (Physical Medicine & Rehabilitation)Hospice and Palliative MedicineNeuromuscular MedicinePain MedicinePediatric Rehabilitation MedicineSpinal Cord Injury MedicineSports MedicinePhysical Therapist (PT)CardiopulmonaryClinical ElectrophysiologyErgonomicsGeriatricsHandHuman FactorsNeurologyOrthopedicPediatricsPelvic Pain/DysfunctionSportsPhysician Assistant (PA)DermatologyMedicalSurgicalPlastic, Reconstructive, and Cosmetic SurgeonHand Surgery SpecialistHead and Neck Surgery SpecialistPodiatrist (Foot Specialist)Foot & Ankle SurgeryFoot SurgeryGeneral PracticePodiatristPrimary Podiatric MedicinePublic MedicineRadiologySports MedicinePoetry TherapistPreventive Medicine SpecialistAerospace MedicineMedical ToxicologyOccupational MedicinePreventive Medicine/Occupational Environmental MedicinePublic Health & General Preventive MedicineSports MedicineUndersea and Hyperbaric MedicineProsthetistPsychiatristAddiction PsychiatryChild & Adolescent PsychiatryForensic PsychiatryGeriatric PsychiatryPsychosomatic MedicinePsychiatrist / NeurologistAddiction MedicineBariatric MedicineClinical NeurophysiologyHospice & Palliative MedicineSleep MedicineSports MedicinePsychoanalystPsychologistAddiction & Substance Use DisordersAdult Development & AgingClinicalClinical Child & AdolescentCognitive & BehavioralCounselingEducationalExercise & SportsFamilyForensicGroup PsychotherapyHealthHealth ServiceMedical (Prescribing)Men & MasculinityMental Retardation & Developmental DisabilitiesPsychoanalysisPsychotherapyRehabilitationSchoolWomenPulmonologist (Lung Specialist)RadiologistBody ImagingDiagnostic NeuroimagingDiagnostic RadiologyDiagnostic UltrasoundHospice & Palliative MedicineNeuroradiologyNuclear RadiologyPediatric RadiologyRadiation OncologyRadiological PhysicsTherapeutic RadiologyVascular & Interventional RadiologyRecreation TherapistReflexologistRegistered Nurse (RN)Addiction & Substance Use DisorderAdministratorAmbulatory CareCardiac RehabilitationCase ManagementCollege HealthCommunity HealthContinence CareContinuing Education/Staff DevelopmentCritical Care MedicineDiabetes EducationEmergencyEnterostomal TherapyFlightGastroenterologyGeneral PracticeGerontologyHemodialysisHome HealthHospiceInfection ControlInfusion TherapyLactation ConsultantMaternal NewbornMedical-SurgicalNeonatal Intensive CareNeonatal, Low-RiskNephrologyNeuroscienceNMTNutrition SupportObstetric, High-RiskObstetric, InpatientOccupational HealthOncologyOphthalmicOrthopedicOstomy CareOtorhinolaryngology & Head-NeckPain ManagementPediatric OncologyPediatricsPerinatalPeritoneal DialysisPlastic SurgeryPsych/Mental HealthPsych/Mental Health, AdultPsych/Mental Health, Child & AdolescentRegistered Nurse First AssistantRehabilitationReproductive Endocrinology/InfertilitySchoolUrologyWomen's Health Care, AmbulatoryWound CareRehabilitation CounselorAssistive Technology PractitionerAssistive Technology SupplierOrientation and Mobility Training ProviderRespiratory TherapistCritical CareEducationalEmergency CareGeneral CareGeriatric CareHome HealthNeonatal/PediatricsPalliative & HospicePatient TransportPulmonary DiagnosticsPulmonary Function TechnologyPulmonary RehabilitationSNF/Subacute CareRheumatologist (Joints & Arthritis Specialist)Skilled Nursing Facility CareSleep Medicine SpecialistSocial WorkerClinicalSchoolSpeech-Language PathologistSports Medicine SpecialistAnti-Aging and Regenerative MedicineStudentStudentSurgeonCosmetic SurgeonOral & Maxillofacial SurgeryPediatric SurgerySurgery of the HandSurgical Critical CareSurgical OncologyTrauma SurgeryVascular SurgeryThoracic Surgeon (Cardiothoracic Vascular Surgeon)Transplant HepatologistTransplant SurgeonUrologistPediatric Urology 


Any Specialty
Acupuncturist (Alternative Medicine)Addiction Medicine SpecialistAdolescent Medicine SpecialistAllergist-ImmunologistAnaplastologistAnesthesiologistArt TherapistAudiologistBariatrician (Weight Loss Specialist)Cardiologist (Heart Specialist)Certified Nurse MidwifeCertified Respiratory Therapist (CRT)ChiropractorClinical / Laboratory ImmunologistClinical NeuropsychologistClinical Nurse Specialist (CNS)Clinical PharmacologistColon & Rectal Surgeon (Proctologist)Concierge MedicineCounselorCritical Care SpecialistDance TherapistDentistDenturist (Dentures Specialist)Dermatologist (Skin Specialist)Developmental TherapistDietary ManagerDietitianEmergency DoctorEndocrinologist (Diabetes & Hormones Specialist)Family DoctorGastroenterologist (Stomach & Bowel Specialist)General Practice Doctor (General Practitioner)Geriatric Medicine DoctorHearing Instrument SpecialistHematology / Oncology SpecialistHepatologist (Liver, Gallbladder & Pancreas)Homeopath (Alternative Medicine)Hospice & Palliative Medicine SpecialistHospice & Palliative SurgeonHospitalistIndependent Medical ExaminerInfectious Disease SpecialistInternistInterventional CardiologistKinesiotherapistLegal Medicine SpecialistLicensed Physchiatric Technician (LPT)Licensed Practical Nurse (LPN)Licensed Skin Care SpecialistLicensed Vocational Nurse (LVN)Magnetic Resonance Imaging (MRI) SpecialistMarriage & Family TherapistMassage TherapistMechanotherapistMedical GeneticistMedical Geneticist (Genetic & Hereditary Disease Specialist) Music TherapistNaprapath (Alternative Medicine)Naturopath (Alternative Medicine)Nephrologist (Kidney Specialist)Neurological SurgeonNeurologistNeuromusculoskeletal Medicine SpecialistNuclear Medicine SpecialistNurse AnesthetistNurse Practitioner (NP)Nutrition CounselingNutritionistObstetrician / Gynecologist (OBGYN)Occupational Therapist (OT)Ophthalmologist (Eye Doctor)Optometrist (Eye & Vision Specialist)Orthopedic SurgeonOrthotics/Prosthetics FitterOrthotistOther DoctorsOther Healthcare ProfessionalOtolaryngologist (Ear, Nose & Throat - ENT)Pain Medicine SpecialistPathologistPediatrician (Kids / Children Specialist)PharmacistPharmacist Clinician (PhC)/ Clinical PharmacistPharmacotherapistPhlebologist (Vein Specialist)Physiatrist (Physical Medicine & Rehabilitation)Physical Therapist (PT)Physician Assistant (PA)Plastic, Reconstructive, and Cosmetic SurgeonPodiatrist (Foot Specialist)Poetry TherapistPreventive Medicine SpecialistProsthetistPsychiatristPsychiatrist / NeurologistPsychoanalystPsychologistPulmonologist (Lung Specialist)RadiologistRecreation TherapistReflexologistRegistered Nurse (RN)Rehabilitation CounselorRespiratory TherapistRheumatologist (Joints & Arthritis Specialist)Skilled Nursing Facility CareSleep Medicine SpecialistSocial WorkerSpeech-Language PathologistSports Medicine SpecialistStudentSurgeonThoracic Surgeon (Cardiothoracic Vascular Surgeon)Transplant HepatologistTransplant SurgeonUrologist 


Location
 

Insurance Carrier

Any Carrier
Loading...



Insurance Plan

Any Plan
Loading...



Search by Name ›
 New Search





Provider




 

Practice (optional)
 

Location
 

Search by Specialty ›
New Search








Filter:


Search Radius



 



10 miles



Provider Gender

Any Gender
Only Men
Only Women



Languages Spoken

Any Language
Afrikaans
Albanian
American Sign Language (ASL)
Arabic
Armenian
Assyrian
Bosnian
Bulgarian
Burmese
Caldean
Cantonese
Chinese
Creole
Czech
Dutch
English
Farsi
Filipino
French
Fujianese
German
Greek
Gujurati
Hebrew
Himachali
Hindi
Hindi (Urdu)
Hmong
Hungarian
Indian
Indonesian
Italian
Japanese
Kannada
Konkani
Korean
Lingala
Lithuanian
Macedonian
Malay
Malayalam
Mandarin
Marathi
Norwegian
Pashto
Pashtu
Persian
Persian / Farsi
Polish
Portuguese
Punjabi
Romanian
Russian
Shanghainese
Slovak
Spanish
Swahili
Swedish
Tagalog
Taiwanese
Tamil
Thai
Thai (Laotian)
Toishanese
Tshiluba
Turkish
Turkish/Azeri
Ukrainian
Ukranian
Urdu
Vietnamese
Welsh
Yiddish
 


                                ProfilePoints
                                




 

0 /80




Min. Rating







                                        Board Certified
                                    


                                    Online Scheduling
                                


                                    Verified
                                

















1-10 of 57963 Matching  providers in  10 miles of New York, NY  



1 


                    Robert M. Sorin, D.M.D.                                            




Dentist


                Sponsored
                





 






Avg. Rating: 5/5



Main Location

                        425 Madison Avenue Suite 405New York, New York 10017                    


Highlights

Has Online Scheduling 


Summary

                        Dr. Robert M. Sorin is a Comprehensive Aesthetic and Restorative Dentist serving the New York area for more than 40 years.  Read More 






2 


                    Daniel Drapacz, D.P.M.                                            




Podiatrist (Foot Specialist)


                Sponsored
                





 






Avg. Rating: 5/5



Main Location

                        65 Broadway Suite 1103New York, New York 10006                    


Highlights

Has Online Scheduling 


Summary

                        Dr. Daniel Drapacz is a Podiatrist serving the New York area for more than 20 years. Read More 






3 


                    Arthur W. Perry, M.D., F.A.C.S.                                            




Surgeon


                Sponsored
                





 






Avg. Rating: 5/5



Main Location

                        3055 Rte 27Franklin Park, New Jersey 08823                    


Highlights

Board CertifiedHas Online Scheduling 


Summary

                        Dr. Arthur W. Perry is a Cosmetic Surgeon serving the Franklin Park and Manhattan areas for more than 30 years. Read More 






4 


                    Lois A. Jackson, D.D.S.                                            




Dentist


                Sponsored
                





 






Avg. Rating: 5/5



Main Location

                        505 Laguardia Place L-4New York, New York 10012                    


Highlights

Has Online Scheduling 


Summary

                        Dr. Lois A. Jackson is a Pediatric Dentist serving the New York and Brooklyn areas for more than 35 years.  Read More 






5 


                    Dr. Eric Linden, D.M.D., M.S.D.                                             




Dentist


                Sponsored
                





 






Avg. Rating: 5/5



Main Location

                        170 West End Ave. 1LNew York, New York 10023                    


Summary

                        Dr. Eric Linden is a Periodontist serving the New York area for more than 30 years. Read More 






6 


                    Dr. Jose Loor, D.P.M., F.A.C.F.A.O.M.                                            




Podiatrist (Foot Specialist)


                Sponsored
                





 






Avg. Rating: 5/5



Main Location

                        8622 Bay Pkwy.Brooklyn, New York 11214                    


Highlights

Board CertifiedAccepts Insurance PlansHas Online Scheduling 


Summary

                        Dr. Jose Loor, the owner, and founder of De Loor Medical, is one of New York City’s leading podiatrists. Read More 






7 


                    Dr. Jonathan R Roy, D.P.M, M.S.                                            




Podiatrist (Foot Specialist)


                Sponsored
                





 




cqswrcsaewrwasvwcudyqsdaaasxqfe

Avg. Rating: 5/5



Main Location

                        235 East 22nd StreetNew York, New York 10010                    


Highlights

Accepts Insurance PlansHas Online Scheduling 


Summary

                        Dr. Jonathan Roy is a native New Yorker and a Podiatrist serving the greater New York area. He is specialized in Reconstructive foot and ankle surge.. Read More 






8 


                    Aleksander S. Iofin, D.M.D.                                            




Dentist


                Sponsored
                





 






Avg. Rating: 5/5



Main Location

                        45 Rockefeller Plaza Suite 1863New York, New York 10111                    


Highlights

Has Online Scheduling 


Summary

                        Dr. Aleksander S. Iofin is an Endodontist serving the New York area for more than 15 years. Read More 






9 


                    Mark Sharobeem, D.P.M.                                            




Podiatrist (Foot Specialist)


                Sponsored
                





 






Avg. Rating: 5/5



Main Location

                        132 E 22nd St.New York, New York 10010                    


Highlights

Accepts Insurance PlansHas Online Scheduling 


Summary

                        Dr. Mark Sharobeem is a Podiatrist serving the New York area for more than 3 years. Read More 






10 


                    Gregg Greenblatt, D.P.M.                                            




Podiatrist (Foot Specialist)


                Sponsored
                





 






Avg. Rating: 5/5



Main Location

                        512 Seventh Ave. Ste. 1404New York, New York 10018                    


Highlights

Board CertifiedHas Online Scheduling 


Summary

                        Dr. Gregg Greenblatt is a Podiatrist serving the New York area for more than 20 years.  Read More 






<< First
< Previous
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
Next >
Last >> 
































































  

















Dr. Torrence M Wilson, MD









































































cqswrcsaewrwasvwcudyqsdaaasxqfe












Marketing automation for healthcare













 Log-in to Doctor.com






Email:


Password:





Don't have an account?
Sign Up Now


Forgot your password?
Reset it Here









Request a Free Demo







Please enter a first name.



Please enter a last name.



Please enter a valid email address.



Please enter a valid phone number.














Submitting...


Or  Call Now (888) 666-8161








Thank you!


        We're currently processing your request and we'll be in touch soon. For a faster response, please call us directly at 888-666-8135.
    






Doctor.com ProfilePoints™


ProfilePoints™ measure the overall completeness of a
        provider's profile, including items like having a photo, a biography,
        insurance, payment options, etc. A full breakdown of points can be seen
        by providers with Doctor.com accounts when editing their profile on Doctor.com.
        
By showing providers with higher ProfilePoints™ first,
        we make it easier for you to quickly identify the most informative profiles on Doctor.com
        




















Home






MN






Rochester




                            Dr. Torrence M Wilson, MD                        













 




About ProfilePoints™





                                    0 Patient Reviews

                                    Rate Provider
                                





View Phone #Call Now 
mayo.edu  |  mayoclinic.com  |  nebraskacancer.com/





                            Dr. Torrence M Wilson, MD                                                    

                            Urologist - General                        







                                        Highlights
                                    

Board CertifiedAccepts Insurance Plans 



                                Biography
                            
Dr. Torrence M Wilson, MD is a Urologist - General practicing in Rochester, MNHe has not yet shared a personalized biography with Doctor.com. 


Are you Dr. Torrence M Wilson, MD?
 Claim your  100% free profile to:

Respond to patient reviews
Customize your profile
Improve your visibility to our millions of monthly users


                                        Claim your profile
                                    











Main Location
                                200 1st St SWRochester, MN, 55905 

























Summary


Locations


Accepted Insurance


Services & Fees


Reviews



Summary
Locations
Accepted Insurance
Services & Fees
Reviews









                Provider Training
            
UniversityDegreeFocusGraduatedMedical College of Ga School of Medicine, Augusta Ga Other Degree1974InstitutionFocusYearResidency - Fitzsimons Army Medical Center, Urology; Fitzsimons Army Medical Center, Internal MedicineNot SpecifiedCertificationCert. BodyYearUrologyUrologyNot Specified 


Experience & Accolades
Dr. Torrence M Wilson, MD has not yet specified details about his experience and accolades. 



                    Practice & Hospital Affiliations
                
Dr. Torrence M Wilson, MD has not yet indicated the hospitals that  he is affiliated with. 





                Specialties
            
Languages SpokenEnglishMedical SpecialtiesUrologistUrologyYears In Practice: 36 (started in 1981)Accepts New Patients: Yes 



                    Accepted Insurance
                

                    Full Insurance List
                




                Payment Options
            

                Payment Details
            







                Affiliated Practices
            
 




Practice At 200 1st St SW 

            200 1st St SW Rochester, MN, 55905                            






                    Practice Colleagues
                




            Dr Kim Strupp, MD                                  -  
                                
                                Anesthesiologist                                




                            Open Profile
                        





             barbara jerabek, CRNA                                  -  
                                
                                Nurse Anesthetist                                




                            Open Profile
                        





             Sherrie Hanna, MA, LP                                  -  
                                
                                Psychologist                                




                            Open Profile
                        





             Stephanie Kimmes, RN, CNP                                  -  
                                
                                Nurse Practitioner (NP)                                




                            Open Profile
                        





            Dr Mark Larson, MD                                  -  
                                
                                Gastroenterologist (Stomach & Bowel Specialist)                                




                            Open Profile
                        





            Dr Elson So, MD                                  -  
                                
                                Neurologist                                




                            Open Profile
                        





             gregg vanderwaerdt, Other                                  -  
                                
                                Physician Assistant (PA)                                




                            Open Profile
                        





            Dr Atul Kamath, MD                                  -  
                                
                                Orthopedic Surgeon                                




                            Open Profile
                        







            Dr Matthew Block, MD, PHD                                  -  
                                
                                Hematology / Oncology Specialist, Internist                                




                            Open Profile
                        





            Dr Kris Thomas, MD                                  -  
                                
                                Internist                                




                            Open Profile
                        







            Accepted Insurance
        
Aetna 
See Accepted Plans
Aetna Advantage DentalAetna Affordable Health Choices limited benefits insurance planAetna Choice POSAetna Choice POS (Aetna HealthFund)Aetna Choice POS IIAetna Choice POS II (Aetna HealthFund)Aetna Dental PPO/PDNAetna Golden Choice Plan (PPO)Aetna Golden Medicare Plan (HMO)Aetna Health Network OnlyAetna Health Network OptionAetna HealthFund Aetna Choice POSAetna HealthFund Aetna Health Network OnlyAetna HealthFund Aetna Health Network OptionAetna HealthFund HMOAetna HealthFund Open Access Aetna SelectAetna HealthFund Open Access Elect Choice EPOAetna HealthFund Open Access Managed Choice POSAetna HealthFund Open Access POS IIAetna HealthFund Open Choice PPOAetna Medicare Open (Private Fee-for-Service)Aetna Medicare Plan (HMO/Open Access HMO)Aetna Medicare Plan (PPO)Aetna Medicare Select (HMO)Aetna Medicare Special NeedsAetna Open Access Elect Choice (EPO)Aetna Open Access HMOAetna Open Access Managed Choice (POS)Aetna SelectAetna Value Network HMOAetna VisionAetna Whole Health - Banner Health OAMCAetna Whole Health - MW Comm. Health SolutionsAetna Whole Health- Banner Health Network HMOAetna Workers' Comp AccessAexcelAexcel Aetna SelectAexcel Aetna Select (Open Access)Aexcel Choice POS IIAexcel Choice POS II (Aetna HealthFund)Aexcel Elect Choice EPOAexcel Elect Choice EPO (Open Access)Aexcel Managed Choice POSAexcel Managed Choice POS (Open Access)Aexcel Open Access Aetna Select (Aetna HealthFund)Aexcel Open Access Elect Choice (Aetna HealthFund)Aexcel Open Access Managed Choice POS (HealthFund)Aexcel PlusAexcel Plus Aetna SelectAexcel Plus Aetna Select (Open Access)Aexcel Plus Choice POS IIAexcel Plus Choice POS II (Aetna HealthFund)Aexcel Plus Elect Choice EPOAexcel Plus Elect Choice EPO (Open Access)Aexcel Plus Managed Choice POSAexcel Plus Managed Choice POS (Open Access)Aexcel Plus Open Access Aetna Select (Aetna HealthFund)Aexcel Plus Open Access Elect Choice (Aetna HealthFund)Aexcel Plus Open Access Managed Choice POS (HealthFund)Aexcel Plus PPOAexcel Plus PPO (Aetna HealthFund)Aexcel PPOAexcel PPO (Aetna HealthFund)Affordable Health ChoicesBehavioral Healthcare ProgramBetter HealthBetter Health Kids PennsylvaniaElect Choice (EPO)Employee Assistance ProgramHCA Smart Care Base (PPO)HCA Smart Care Plus (PPO)HCA Smart Care SelectHCA Smart Care Value (PPO)HCA Well Care (Level 3)HCA Well Care (Levels 1 & 2)Healthy New York HMOHMOHMO (Open Access)HMO Deductible PlanHMO Deductible Plan (CA members only)Illinois Community NetworkIllinois Managed Choice NetworkLM HealthworksManaged Choice (POS)Managed Choice Open AccessManaged Choice Open Access HDHPManaged Choice Open Access Value 1500Managed Choice Open Access Value 5000MCOA 7500Medicare Plan (HMO / Open Access HMO)Medicare Plan (PPO)Medicare Rx Premier (PDP)National Advantage ProgramNew York Certified PPO (Workers' Comp)New York Recommendation of Care PPO (Workers' Comp)North Shore LIJ Employee Health Plan (CIIPA)NYC Community PlanOpen Access Aetna SelectOpen Choice (PPO)PCP Referral Plan (TX only)Preventative and Hospital Care 3000Quality Point-of-Service (QPOS)Savings Plus of ArizonaSavings Plus of Chicago, ILSavings Plus of Florida (Brevard and Tampa)Savings Plus of Lake County, OHSavings Plus of OklahomaSavings Plus of TexasSignature AdministratorsStudent Health PlansTexas CHIPTexas STAR (Medicaid)Texas Voluntary/Informal (Workers' Comp)Traditional Choice IndemnityUSAccessVitalidad Mexico con AetnaVitalidad Plus California con AetnaVolunteer PlanCigna 
See Accepted Plans
Achieve (Medicare Advantage HMO SNP)Achieve Plus (Medicare Advantage HMO-POS SNP)Behavioral HealthChoice Fund Open Access PlusChoice Fund Open Access Plus with CareLinkChoice Fund PPOCIGNA Dental PPOClassic Plus (Medicare Advantage HMO)EPOFL Health SavingsFL Open AccessFL Open Access ValueFreedom (Medicare Advantage PPO)Health SavingsHMOHMO - Northern CaliforniaHMO - Northern California Open AccessHMO - Southern CaliforniaHMO - Southern California Open AccessHMO Open AccessIndemnityLiberty ILiberty II RxLiberty SilverLocalPlusMedicare AccessMedicare Select (HMO)NetworkNetwork - Northern CaliforniaNetwork - Northern California Open AccessNetwork - Southern CaliforniaNetwork - Southern California Open AccessNetwork Open AccessNetwork POSOpen Access PlanOpen Access Plus ONLYOpen Access Plus/CareLinkPOSPOS - Northern CaliforniaPOS - Northern California Open AccessPOS - Southern CaliforniaPOS - Southern California Open AccessPOS Open AccessPreferred Provider Organization (PPO)Select (Medicare Advantage HMO SNP)Traditions (Medicare Advantage HMO SNP)Vision PPOWorkers' CompensationMultiplan PHCS 
See Accepted Plans
Arizona Medical Network (AMN)HealthEOS PPOHealthEOS Select PPOMultiplan PPOPHCS Healthy Directions (Extended PPO)PHCS Network PPOValuePoint 



Procedures & Treatments OfferedDr. Torrence M Wilson, MD has not yet provided information about the medical procedures and treatments offered by his practice.Commonly Prescribed MedicationsTamsulosin Hydrochloride Billing Policies & Payment OptionsDr. Torrence M Wilson, MD has not yet added any information about his practice's billing policies and payment options.




Average Rating:



            Write a Review
        



Office & Staff Evaluation
                                Not rated


Ease of Getting an Appointment
Not rated


Courtesy of Practice Staff
Not rated


Office Appearance & Atmosphere
Not rated


Handling of Billing Matters
Not rated


Average Wait Time
Not Rated






























  









	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started





































Wilson M. Torrence, Board Dir., Alliance Resource Partners LP














A publisher of Business Information since 1983   
  





 


   

Search Business Search Executive 
  Advanced Search 




  

Sign In  |  Hints 









Profile of Wilson Torrence 





 


Wilson Torrence

 

Board Dir. - Alliance Resource Partners LP

 


Wilson Torrence Email :
Please login 

 

Company Name : 
Alliance Resource Partners LP 

 

Company Website : 
www.arlp.com 

 

Company Address : 
1717 S Boulder Ave.Ste. 400, Tulsa, OK,United States, 


 


Wilson Torrence Profile :
Board Dir. - Alliance Resource Partners LP 

 


Wilson Torrence Biography :


Wilson M. (Mack) Torrence retired from Fluor Corporation in 2006 as a Senior Vice President and is currently performing investment and business consulting services for clients in various energy related businesses. Mr. Torrence was responsible at Fluor for the global Project Development, Investment and Structured Finance Group and served as Chairman of Fluor's Investment Committee. Prior to joining Fluor in 1989, he was President and CEO of Combustion Engineering Corporation's Waste to Energy Division and during that time also served as Chairman of the Institute of Resource Recovery and a Board member of the National Solid Waste Management Association, both Washington-based industry advocacy organizations. Mr. Torrence began his career at Mobil Oil Corporation, where he held several executive positions, including Assistant Treasurer of Mobil's International Marketing and Refining Division and Chief Financial Officer of Mobil Land Development Company. He holds Bachelor and Masters degrees in Business Administration from Virginia Tech University. In addition to Alliance, Mr. Torrence serves on the Board of Directors of Cleantech America, LLC, a company involved in the development and commercialization of central station solar generated power projects. 

 


Wilson Torrence Colleagues :





Name 
Title 
Email 


Joseph Craft 
Pres., CEO and Dir. 
Please login 


Robert Sachse 
Exec. VP, Marketing 
Please login 


Michael Hall 
Board Dir. 
Please login 


Merribel Ayres 
Board Dir. 
Please login 


John Neafsey 
Board Dir., Board Chmn. 
Please login 













            Home  |  About Us  |  Product Information   |  Subscription  |  List Builder   |  Executive List   |  Email Lists   |  Contact Us  |  Site Map  |  Browse Directory    





 

© 2009, Walkers's Research - A publisher of Business Information since 1983, All Rights Reserved.



